apertium-fra-spa.fra.metadix
    <pardef n="bala/yer__vblex">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>iera</l>      <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ierai</l>     <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ieraient</l>  <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ierais</l>    <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ierais</l>    <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ierait</l>    <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ieras</l>     <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ierez</l>     <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ieriez</l>    <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ierions</l>   <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ierons</l>    <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ieront</l>    <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ye</l>        <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ye</l>        <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ye</l>        <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ye</l>        <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ye</l>        <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ye</l>        <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>yent</l>      <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>yent</l>      <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>yes</l>       <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>yes</l>       <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ie</l>               <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ie</l>               <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ie</l>               <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ie</l>               <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ie</l>               <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ie</l>               <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ient</l>             <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ient</l>             <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ies</l>              <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ies</l>              <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ya</l>               <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yai</l>              <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yaient</l>           <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yais</l>             <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yais</l>             <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yait</l>             <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yant</l>             <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yant</l>             <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yas</l>              <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yasse</l>            <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yassent</l>          <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yasses</l>           <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yassiez</l>          <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yassions</l>         <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yer</l>              <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yera</l>             <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yerai</l>            <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeraient</l>         <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yerais</l>           <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yerais</l>           <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yerait</l>           <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeras</l>            <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yerez</l>            <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeriez</l>           <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yerions</l>          <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yerons</l>           <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeront</l>           <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yez</l>              <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yez</l>              <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
      <e><p><l>yez</l>              <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yiez</l>             <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yiez</l>             <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yions</l>            <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yions</l>            <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yons</l>             <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yons</l>             <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
      <e><p><l>yons</l>             <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yâmes</l>            <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yât</l>              <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yâtes</l>            <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yèrent</l>           <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yé</l>               <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yée</l>              <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yées</l>             <r>yer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="appuyer" a="eleka" r="LR">       <i>appu</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="balayer">                        <i>bala</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="effrayer" a="eleka">             <i>effra</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="effrayer">                       <i>effra</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="égayer" a="eleka">               <i>éga</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="égayer">                         <i>éga</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ennuyer" a="eleka">              <i>ennu</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="égayer">                  <p><l>Ega</l><r>éga</r></p><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="essayer">                        <i>essa</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="étayer" a="eleka">               <i>éta</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="layer" a="eleka">                <i>la</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nettoyer" a="eleka">             <i>netto</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nettoyer">                       <i>netto</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="octroyer" a="eleka">             <i>octro</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ondoyer" a="eleka">              <i>ondo</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="payer">                          <i>pa</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="payer à l'échéance" a="eleka">   <i>pa</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>à<b/>l'échéance</l><r><g><b/>à<b/>l'échéance</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="payer au comptant" a="eleka">    <i>pa</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>au<b/>comptant</l><r><g><b/>au<b/>comptant</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="payer au fisc" a="eleka">        <i>pa</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>au<b/>fisc</l><r><g><b/>au<b/>fisc</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="payer d'avance" a="eleka">       <i>pa</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>d'avance</l><r><g><b/>d'avance</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="payer des impôts" a="eleka">     <i>pa</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>des<b/>impôts</l><r><g><b/>des<b/>impôts</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="payer en espèces" a="eleka">     <i>pa</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>en<b/>espèces</l><r><g><b/>en<b/>espèces</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="payer en liquide" a="eleka">     <i>pa</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>en<b/>liquide</l><r><g><b/>en<b/>liquide</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="payer sauf bonne fin" a="eleka"> <i>pa</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>sauf<b/>bonne<b/>fin</l><r><g><b/>sauf<b/>bonne<b/>fin</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="rayer">                          <i>ra</i><par n="bala/yer__vblex"/></e>
